Massachusetts, session 194th, H1256.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 12 of chapter 156C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2010 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking subsection (d) and inserting in place thereof the 
following:- 
“(d) The fee for the filing of the certificate of organization required by subsection (a) 
shall be two hundred fifty dollars. The fee for the filing of the annual report required by 
subsection (c) shall be two hundred fifty dollars. Such fees shall be paid to the state secretary at 
the time the certificate of organization or the annual report is filed.” 
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall be effective beginning January 1, 2016.